Arkansas, session 2025, HB1339.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to amend the law concerning age
and years of service requirements under the various state retirement systems
and Arkansas public employee retirement plans.










*LJH103*
01/30/2025 3:34:09 PM LJH103